Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. ORS 414.577 is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 414.
SECTION 2.  ORS 414.577 is amended to read:
414.577. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Local mental health authority” has the meaning given that term in ORS 430.630.
(b) “Local planning committee” has the meaning given that term in ORS 430.306.
[(1)] (2) A coordinated  care organization shall collaborate with local public health authorities ,
community mental health  programs, local planning committees  and hospitals located in areas
served by the coordinated care organization to conduct  a community health assessment and adopt
a community health improvement plan, shared with and endorsed by the coordinated care organiza-
tion, local public health authorities , community mental health programs,  local planning com-
mittees and hospitals, to serve as a strategic population health and  health care services plan for
the residents of the areas served  by the coordinated care organization, local public health authori-
ties, community mental health programs, local planning committees  and hospitals. The com-
munity health improvement plan must include strategies for achieving shared priorities.
(3)(a) Local public health  authorities, community mental health programs and coordi-
nated care organizations shall include in the community health improvement plan any be-
havioral health plans required by law or by the Oregon Health Authority, including:
(A) Comprehensive local plans adopted  by local mental health authorities under ORS
430.630 (9); and
(B) Comprehensive behavioral health plans developed by coordinated care organizations.
(b) The inclusion in the community health improvement plan of the behavioral  health
plans described in paragraph (a) of this subsection does not change the  party that is re-
sponsible for developing or implementing a behavioral health plan described  in paragraph (a)
of this subsection.
[(2)] (4) The coordinated care organization  shall post the  community  health improvement plan
to the coordinated care organization’s website.
[(3)] (5) The  [ Oregon Health ] authority [ may] shall prescribe by rule requirements for commu-
nity health improvement plans and provide guidance for aligning :
Enrolled House Bill 2208 (HB 2208-A) Page 1
(a) The timelines for the development of  the community health assessments and community
health improvement plans by coordinated care  organizations, local public health authorities , com-
munity mental health programs, local planning committees  and hospitals ; and
(b) The requirements of  this section with other planning or reporting requirements that
coordinated care organizations are subject to, including planning or reporting  requirements
regarding:
(A) Health inequities;
(B) Social determinants of health;
(C) Health technology;
(D) Payment models;
(E) Oral health integration;
(F) Language access; and
(G) Traditional health worker integration and utilization .
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 414.577 by section 2 of this 2025 Act apply to com-
munity health improvement plans adopted on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
Passed by House June 12, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2208 (HB 2208-A) Page 2